Illinois, session 104th, SB4112.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 6MULTI-MODAL OPERATIONS 7    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 9named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 10ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 11Transportation: 12DEPARTMENT-WIDE13  For Personal Services...........................595,899,90014   Split approximated below:15   Central Administration and Planning.............41,737,40016   Planning and Programming........................13,662,80017   Highway Project Implementation..................43,001,40018   Day Labor........................................3,599,80019   District 1.....................................152,817,00020   District 2......................................39,260,50021   District 3......................................39,544,50022   District 4......................................40,047,80023   District 5......................................34,834,500  SB4112- 2 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1   District 6......................................48,439,6002   District 7......................................38,080,7003   District 8......................................55,839,0004   District 9......................................33,958,8005   Aeronautics......................................4,524,9006   Intermodal Project Implementation................6,551,2007  For Extra Help for Districts 1 - 9...............45,378,0008   Split approximated below:9   District 1......................................13,300,00010   District 2.......................................4,650,00011   District 3.......................................4,550,00012   District 4.......................................4,769,00013   District 5.......................................2,850,00014   District 6.......................................4,450,00015   District 7.......................................3,250,00016   District 8.......................................4,659,00017   District 9.......................................2,900,00018  For State Contributions to State19   Employees' Retirement System...................278,667,40020  For State Contributions to Social Security.......47,407,10021    Total                                        $967,352,400 22    Section 10. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 24named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 25ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of   SB4112- 3 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Transportation: 2FOR CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICES3  For Contractual Services.........................28,344,6004  For Travel..........................................595,7005  For Commodities.....................................312,2006  For Printing........................................518,2007  For Equipment.......................................293,2008  For Equipment:9   Purchase of Cars and Trucks........................245,70010  For Telecommunication Services......................315,00011  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............648,40012    Total                                         $31,273,000 13LUMP SUMS 14    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 16Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named:18  For costs associated with hazardous19   material abatement.................................500,00020  For costs associated with auditing21   consultants for internal22   and external audits..............................2,900,00023  For costs associated with process modernization24   implementation of the Department...................200,000  SB4112- 4 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Total                                          $3,600,000 2    Section 20. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 4Department of Transportation for State Prompt Payment Act 5Interest Costs, including prior years' costs. 6AWARDS AND GRANTS 7    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 9Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 10purposes hereinafter named:11  For Tort Claims, including payment pursuant12   to the State Employee Indemnification Act........4,700,00013  For representation and indemnification for14   the Department of Transportation, the Illinois15   State Police and the Secretary of State,16   provided that the representation required17   resulted from the Road Fund portion 18   of their normal operations.........................100,00019  For auto liability payments for the Department of20   Transportation, the Illinois State Police, and the21   Secretary of State, provided that the liability 22   resulted from the Road Fund portion of23   their normal operations..........................4,350,00024    Total                                          $9,150,000   SB4112- 5 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1REFUNDS 2    Section 30. The following named amount, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 4Department of Transportation for the objects and purposes 5hereinafter named:6  For Refunds..........................................14,100 7FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 8    Section 35. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 10named, is appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the ordinary 11and contingent expenses of the Department of Transportation:12  For Electronic Data Processing...................99,666,300 13FOR PLANNING AND PROGRAMMING 14    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 16named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department 17of Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 18the Office of Planning and Programming:19  For Contractual Services............................677,20020  For Travel..........................................200,00021  For Commodities......................................62,50022  For Printing........................................100,00023  For Equipment.......................................400,000  SB4112- 6 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................260,0002  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............100,0003    Total                                          $1,799,700 4LUMP SUMS 5    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 7Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 8purposes hereinafter named:9  For Planning, Research and 10   Development Purposes...............................250,00011  For metropolitan planning and research purposes 12   as provided by law, provided such amount shall13   not exceed funds to be made available from the14   federal government or local sources.............96,219,50015  For metropolitan planning and research16   purposes as provided by law.....................26,288,70017    Total                                        $122,758,200 18    Section 50. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 20Department of Transportation for all costs associated with a 21consultant to assist with the transition from the Regional 22Transportation Authority to the Northern Illinois Transit 23Authority.   SB4112- 7 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 55. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 3Department of Transportation for administrative support for 4the Interagency Coordinating Committee on Transit Innovation, 5Integration, and Reform and for the Transit Integration Policy 6Development Committee. 7FOR HIGHWAYS PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 8    Section 60. The following named sums, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 10named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department 11of Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 12the Office of Highway Implementation:13  For Contractual Services..........................6,653,30014  For Travel..........................................410,00015  For Commodities.....................................272,30016  For Printing.........................................10,40017  For Equipment.....................................8,870,00018  For Equipment:19   Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................30,658,20020  For Telecommunication Services....................3,640,00021  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............803,90022    Total                                         $51,318,100 23LUMP SUMS 24    Section 65. The sum of $5,400,000, or so much thereof as   SB4112- 8 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for payments to local governments 3for reimbursement of eligible expenses arising from local 4Traffic Signal Maintenance Agreements.     5        Section 70. The sum of $16,700,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 7Department of Transportation for payments to local governments 8for reimbursement of eligible expenses arising from City, 9County, and other State Maintenance Agreements. 10    Section 75. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 12Department of Transportation for repair of damages by 13motorists to state vehicles and equipment or replacement of 14state vehicles and equipment, provided such amount not exceed 15funds to be made available from collections from claims filed 16by the Department to recover the costs of such damages. 17    Section 80. The sum of $6,500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 19Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 20State Radio Communications for the 21st Century (STARCOM) 21program. 22    Section 85. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may   SB4112- 9 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 3Illinois Terrorism Task Force, that consist of approved 4purchases for homeland security provided such expenditures do 5not exceed funds made available by the federal government for 6this purpose. 7    Section 90. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 9Department of Transportation for costs incurred by the 10Department's response to natural disasters, emergencies and 11acts of terrorism that receive Presidential and/or State 12Disaster Declaration status. These costs would include, but 13not be limited to, the Department's fuel costs, cost of 14materials and cost of equipment rentals. This appropriation is 15in addition to the Department's other appropriations for 16District and Central Office operations. 17    Section 95. The sum of $210,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 19Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 20Technology Transfer Center, including the purchase of 21equipment, media initiatives, and training, provided that such 22expenditures do not exceed funds to be made available by the 23federal government for this purpose.   SB4112- 10 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 100. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 3Department of Transportation for costs associated with highway 4safety media campaigns, provided such amounts do not exceed 5funds to be made available from the federal government. 6    Section 105. The sum of $11,300,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 8Department of Transportation for the IDOT ITS Program. 9    Section 110. The sum of $180,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Transportation Safety 11Highway Hire-back Fund to the Department of Transportation for 12agreements with the Illinois State Police to provide patrol 13officers in highway construction work zones. 14    Section 115. The sum of $200,000, or so much there of as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the DUI Prevention and 16Education Fund to the Department of Transportation for 17expenditures, as determined by the DUI Prevention and 18Education Commission, for crash victim programs and materials, 19impaired driving prevention programs, law enforcement support, 20and other DUI-related programs. 21AWARDS AND GRANTS 22    Section 120. The sum of $5,787,600, or so much thereof as   SB4112- 11 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for reimbursement to counties 3participating in the County Engineers Compensation Program for 4salaries in the period agreed upon by the parties without 5regard to state fiscal year. Such reimbursements may not 6exceed funds to be made available from the counties federal 7highway allocations retained by the Department. 8REFUNDS 9    Section 125. The following named amount, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road 11Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 12purposes hereinafter named:13  For Refunds..........................................35,000 14FOR CYCLE RIDER SAFETY 15    Section 130. The following named sums, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 17named, are appropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety Training 18Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 19administration of the Cycle Rider Safety Training Program: 20OPERATIONS21  For Personal Services...............................307,30022  For State Contributions to State23   Employees' Retirement System.......................133,500  SB4112- 12 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For State Contributions to Social Security...........22,9002  For Group Insurance.................................105,6003  For Contractual Services............................167,0004  For Travel...........................................10,0005  For Commodities......................................37,1006    Total                                            $783,400 7LUMP SUMS 8    Section 135. The sum of $4,800,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety 10Training Fund to the Department of Transportation for 11reimbursements to State and local universities and colleges 12for Cycle Rider Safety Training Programs. 13    Section 140. The following named sums, or so much thereof 14as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 15named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 16ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 17Transportation: 18FOR BUREAU OF DAY LABOR19  For Contractual Services..........................8,336,30020  For Travel..........................................180,00021  For Commodities.....................................339,60022  For Equipment.......................................760,00023  For Equipment:  SB4112- 13 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................1,566,9002  For Telecommunication Services.......................61,6003  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............1,640,0004    Total                                         $12,884,400 5    Section 145. The following named sums, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 7named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 9Transportation: 10DISTRICT 1, SCHAUMBURG OFFICE11  For Contractual Services.........................18,500,00012  For Travel..........................................445,00013  For Commodities..................................12,023,90014  For Equipment.....................................5,390,00015  For Equipment:16   Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................20,340,20017  For Telecommunication Services....................5,312,60018  For Operation of Automotive Equipment........... 25,000,00019    Total                                         $87,011,700 20    Section 150. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 22named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 23ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of   SB4112- 14 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Transportation: 2DISTRICT 2, DIXON OFFICE3  For Contractual Services..........................5,800,0004  For Travel..........................................100,0005  For Commodities...................................6,814,6006  For Equipment.....................................2,459,0007  For Equipment:8   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................3,736,7009  For Telecommunication Services......................304,90010  For Operation of Automotive Equipment............ 8,500,00011    Total                                         $27,715,200 12    Section 155. The following named sums, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 14named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 15ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 16Transportation: 17DISTRICT 3, OTTAWA OFFICE18  For Contractual Services..........................7,300,00019  For Travel...........................................95,00020  For Commodities...................................5,862,90021  For Equipment.....................................2,459,00022  For Equipment:23   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................6,758,900  SB4112- 15 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................332,9002  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............8,600,0003    Total                                         $31,408,700 4    Section 160. The following named sums, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 6named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 7ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 8Transportation: 9DISTRICT 4, PEORIA OFFICE10  For Contractual Services..........................5,650,00011  For Travel...........................................55,00012  For Commodities...................................4,892,10013  For Equipment.....................................2,531,00014  For Equipment:15   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................8,898,70016  For Telecommunication Services......................312,70017  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............8,900,00018    Total                                         $31,239,500 19    Section 165. The following named sums, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 21named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 22ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 23Transportation:   SB4112- 16 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1DISTRICT 5, PARIS OFFICE2  For Contractual Services..........................5,720,0003  For Travel...........................................55,0004  For Commodities...................................3,087,6005  For Equipment.....................................2,459,0006  For Equipment:7   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................3,291,1008  For Telecommunication Services......................330,9009  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............6,800,00010    Total                                         $21,743,600 11    Section 170. The following named sums, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 13named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 14ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 15Transportation: 16DISTRICT 6, SPRINGFIELD OFFICE17  For Contractual Services..........................7,200,00018  For Travel...........................................51,30019  For Commodities...................................3,360,30020  For Equipment.....................................2,690,00021  For Equipment:22   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................7,126,70023  For Telecommunication Services......................380,000  SB4112- 17 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............8,500,0002    Total                                         $29,308,300 3    Section 175. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 5named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 7Transportation: 8DISTRICT 7, EFFINGHAM OFFICE9  For Contractual Services..........................5,600,00010  For Travel...........................................70,00011  For Commodities...................................3,153,30012  For Equipment.....................................2,459,00013  For Equipment:14   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................6,260,80015  For Telecommunication Services......................370,00016  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............5,200,00017    Total                                         $23,113,100 18    Section 180. The following named sums, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 20named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 21ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 22Transportation:   SB4112- 18 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1DISTRICT 8, COLLINSVILLE OFFICE2  For Contractual Services.........................11,850,0003  For Travel...........................................75,0004  For Commodities...................................4,057,6005  For Equipment.....................................3,450,0006  For Equipment:7   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................4,743,4008  For Telecommunication Services....................1,095,1009  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............9,850,00010    Total                                         $35,121,100 11    Section 185. The following named sums, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 13named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 14ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 15Transportation: 16DISTRICT 9, CARBONDALE OFFICE17  For Contractual Services..........................5,550,00018  For Travel...........................................80,00019  For Commodities...................................3,533,60020  For Equipment.....................................2,459,00021  For Equipment:22   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................2,006,70023  For Telecommunication Services......................240,00024  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............5,600,000  SB4112- 19 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Total                                         $19,469,300 2    Section 190. The following named sums, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 4named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and contingent 5expenses of the Department of Transportation: 6FOR AERONAUTICS7  For Contractual Services:8   Payable from the Road Fund.........................975,0009   Payable from Air Transportation 10    Revolving Fund....................................279,10011  For Travel:12   Payable from the Road Fund..........................60,00013  For Commodities:14   Payable from the Road Fund..........................95,00015   Payable from Aeronautics Fund........................6,20016  For Equipment:17   Payable from the Road Fund.........................385,80018  For Telecommunication Services:19   Payable from the Road Fund..........................65,00020  For Operation of Automotive Equipment:21   Payable from the Road Fund..........................81,90022    Total                                          $1,948,000 23LUMP SUMS   SB4112- 20 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 195. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tax Recovery Fund 3to the Department of Transportation for maintenance and repair 4costs incurred on real property owned by the Department for 5development of an airport in Will County, for applicable 6refunds of security deposits to lessees, and for payments to 7the Will County Treasurer in lieu of leasehold taxes lost due 8to government ownership. 9    Section 200. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Aviation 11Program Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 12purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance 13Act. 14    Section 205. The sum of $9,500,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Sound-Reducing 16Windows and Doors Replacement Fund to the Department of 17Transportation for the purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 18of the State Finance Act. 19REFUNDS 20    Section 210. The following named amount, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 22Aeronautics Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 23objects and purposes hereinafter named:  SB4112- 21 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For Refunds.............................................500 2FOR INTERMODAL PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 3    Section 215. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary for the agencies hereinafter named, are 5appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 6Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 7Office of Intermodal Project Implementation:8  For Contractual Services............................798,8009  For Travel...........................................70,00010  For Commodities.......................................6,00011  For Equipment.........................................7,00012  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,00013    Total                                            $931,800 14LUMP SUMS 15    Section 220. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 17Department of Transportation for public transportation 18technical studies. 19    Section 225. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 21Department of Transportation for costs associated with Safety 22and Security Oversight as set forth in the federal 23transportation bill, as amended.   SB4112- 22 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 230. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Downstate 3Public Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation 4for operating assistance to provide a portion of the eligible 5operating expenses for the following carriers for the purposes 6stated in the Downstate Public Transportation Act:7  Champaign-Urbana Mass Transit District...........54,000,3008  Greater Peoria Mass Transit District with9   Service to Peoria County........................36,306,50010  Rock Island County Metropolitan11   Mass Transit District...........................26,848,80012  Rockford Mass Transit District...................26,832,10013  Springfield Mass Transit District................25,984,80014  Bloomington-Normal Public Transit System with15   service to McLean County........................21,186,70016  City of Decatur with service to Macon County.....14,196,80017  City of Quincy....................................4,851,10018  City of Galesburg.................................3,041,60019  Stateline Mass Transit District with 20   service to South Beloit..........................1,893,60021  City of Danville..................................6,628,30022  RIDES Mass Transit District with23   service to Edgar and Clark counties.............18,341,10024  South Central Illinois Mass Transit District.....13,848,80025  River Valley Metro Mass Transit District.........11,381,200  SB4112- 23 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  Jackson County Mass Transit District..............3,995,0002  City of DeKalb...................................11,555,9003  City of Macomb....................................2,509,0004  Shawnee Mass Transit District.....................5,102,7005  St. Clair County Transit District................80,753,5006  West Central Mass Transit District................3,479,9007  Monroe-Randolph Transit District..................1,728,1008  Madison County Mass Transit District.............37,367,3009  Bond County.........................................997,50010  Bureau County with service to Putnam County.......2,413,70011  Coles County......................................1,578,30012  City of Freeport with service 13   to Stephenson County.............................1,471,50014  Henry County........................................640,50015  Jo Daviess County.................................1,413,70016  Kankakee County.....................................803,00017  Piatt County with service to DeWitt County........1,356,00018  Shelby County with service to Christian County....2,239,30019  Tazewell County...................................1,187,80020  Kendall County....................................2,130,20021  Woodford County.....................................707,70022  Reagan Mass Transit District......................5,227,30023  Champaign County..................................1,306,90024  Boone County........................................404,40025  DeKalb County.....................................2,319,20026  Grundy County.......................................878,500  SB4112- 24 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  Warren County with service to Mercer County.........845,1002  Rock Island County..................................338,2003  Hancock County......................................274,4004  Macoupin County...................................1,736,8005  Fulton County.......................................672,3006  Effingham County....................................935,8007  City of Ottawa with service to LaSalle County.....2,462,1008  Carroll County....................................1,066,8009  Logan County........................................514,20010  Sangamon County with service to Menard County.......989,90011  Jersey County with service to Greene12   and Calhoun Counties...............................958,10013  Marshall County with service to Stark County........418,90014  Douglas County......................................368,90015  Winnebago County....................................798,80016  Livingston County with service to Ford17   and Iroquois Counties............................1,078,50018    Total                                        $452,367,400 19    Section 235. The sum of $4,951,200, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Downstate Public 21Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for 22audit adjustments in accordance with Sections 2-7 and 2-15 of 23the Downstate Public Transportation Act, including prior 24years' costs.   SB4112- 25 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 240. The sum of $520,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Mass Transit 3Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation for federal 4reimbursement of costs associated with Safety and Security 5Oversight. 6    Section 245. The sum of $1,540,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Mass 8Transit Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation for 9federal reimbursement of transit studies. 10GRANTS AND AWARDS 11    Section 250. The sum of $1,341,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public 13Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for 14the purpose stated in Section 4.09 of the Northern Illinois 15Transit Authority Act. 16    Section 255. The sum of $100,000,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public 18Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for 19making a grant to the Northern Illinois Transit Authority for 20Additional Financial Assistance to be used for its purposes as 21provided in the Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, but 22in no event shall this amount exceed the amount provided for in 23Sections 4.09 (c-5) and 4.09 (d) with respect to Strategic   SB4112- 26 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Capital Improvement bonds issued by the Northern Illinois 2Transit Authority pursuant to the Northern Illinois Transit 3Authority Act. 4    Section 260. The sum of $23,067,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 6Department of Transportation for grants to the Northern 7Illinois Transit Authority intended to reimburse the Service 8Boards for providing reduced fares on mass transportation 9services for students, handicapped persons, and the elderly, 10to be allocated proportionally among the Service Boards based 11upon actual costs incurred by each Service Board for such 12reduced fares. 13    Section 265. The sum of $11,500,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 15Department of Transportation for making a grant to the 16Northern Illinois Transit Authority for the funding of the 17Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA) paratransit 18services and for other costs and services. 19    Section 270. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 21Department of Transportation for grants to Boards of Trustees 22of Districts created under the Local Mass Transit District Act 23to reimburse the Districts for providing reduced fares on mass   SB4112- 27 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1transportation services for public school students. 2    Section 275. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 4Department of Transportation for grants to Boards of Trustees 5of Districts created under the Local Mass Transit District Act 6for pilot programs in partnership with public school districts 7for providing regular, vocational, or special education 8transportation, except for public school districts organized 9under Article 34 of the School Code. 10    Section 280. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 12Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 13long-term heavy overhauls of locomotives. 14    Section 285. The sum of $76,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 16Department of Transportation for funding the State's share of 17intercity rail passenger service and making necessary 18expenditures for services and other program improvements. 19FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY 20    Section 290. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary for the agencies hereinafter named, are 22appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of   SB4112- 28 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Transportation for implementation of the Illinois Highway 2Safety Program under provisions of the National Highway Safety 3Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic Safety Programs 4of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 51982, as amended, and other federal highway safety initiatives 6as provided by law: 7FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION8  For Contractual Services............................149,1009  For Travel...........................................36,10010  For Commodities......................................24,30011  For Printing.........................................43,70012  For Equipment.............................................013  For Telecommunication Services............................014  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.....................015    Total                                            $253,200 16FOR THE ILLINOIS CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION AUTHORITY17  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 18Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 19Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 20Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 21Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 22safety initiatives as provided by law.................461,100 23FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE  SB4112- 29 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 2Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 3Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 4Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 5Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 6safety initiatives as provided by law.............. 4,120,000 7FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH8  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 9Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 10Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 11Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 12Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 13safety initiatives as provided by law.................851,800 14FOR THE ILLINOIS STATE POLICE15  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 16Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 17Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 18Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 19Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 20safety initiatives as provided by law.............. 7,898,600 21FOR THE ILLINOIS LAW ENFORCEMENT22TRAINING STANDARDS BOARD23  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois   SB4112- 30 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 2Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 3Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 4Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 5safety initiatives as provided by law.................850,000 6FOR THE ADMISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE ILLINOIS COURTS7  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 8Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 9Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 10Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 11Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 12safety initiatives as provided by law.................143,00013  Total                                           $14,577,700 14LUMP SUM AWARDS AND GRANTS 15    Section 295. The sum of $25,900,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 17Department of Transportation for the Illinois Highway Safety 18Program and local highway safety projects by county and 19municipal governments, state and private universities, and 20other private entities. 21MOTOR FUEL TAX ADMINISTRATION 22    Section 300. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Motor Fuel Tax   SB4112- 31 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Fund to the Department of Transportation for the ordinary and 2contingent expenses incident to the operations and functions 3of administering the provisions of the Illinois Highway Code, 4relating to use of Motor Fuel Tax Funds by the counties, 5municipalities, road districts and townships: 6OPERATIONS7  For Personal Services............................14,338,2008  For State Contributions to State9   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,230,70010  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,056,40011  For Group Insurance...............................4,871,30012  For Contractual Services.............................80,40013  For Travel...........................................31,00014  For Commodities.......................................2,00015  For Printing.........................................35,90016  For Equipment.........................................5,90017  For Telecommunication Services.......................13,30018  For Operation of Automotive Equipment................13,00019    Total                                         $26,678,100 20    Section 305. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as are available for distribution in accordance with Section 8 22of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, are appropriated to the Department 23of Transportation for the purposes stated:   SB4112- 32 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS2Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Counties Fund:3  For apportioning, allotting, and paying4   as provided by law to Counties.................205,983,8005Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Municipalities Fund:6  For apportioning, allotting, and paying7   as provided by law to Municipalities...........287,256,2008Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Townships  9 and Road Districts Fund:10  For apportioning, allotting, and paying11   as provided by law to Counties for12   Distribution to Road Districts..................93,385,00013    Total                                        $586,625,000 14    Section 310. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as are available for distribution in accordance with 16Section 8b of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, are appropriated from the 17Transportation Renewal Fund to the Department of 18Transportation for the purposes stated: 19DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS20  For apportioning, allotting, and paying21   as provided by law:22   To Counties....................................202,983,30023   To Municipalities..............................284,675,20024   To Counties for Distribution  SB4112- 33 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    to Road Districts..............................92,128,1002    Total                                        $579,786,600 3    Section 315. No contract shall be entered into or 4obligation incurred or any expenditure made from an 5appropriation herein made in:6Section 255 SCIP II Debt Service of this Article until after 7the purpose and the amount of such expenditure has been 8approved in writing by the Governor. 9  Total, This Article........................$5,004,336,000 10ARTICLE 211DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION12FOR CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION 13    Section 5. The sum of $3,502,956, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 15on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and reappropriation 16heretofore made in Article 66, Section 15 and Article 67, 17Section 5 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 18reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 19Transportation for costs associated with hazardous material 20abatement. 21    Section 10. The sum of $6,745,960, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of   SB4112- 34 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 2reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 15 and 3Article 67, Section 10 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 4reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 5Transportation for costs associated with auditing consultants 6for internal and external audits. 7    Section 15. The sum of $759,110, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 9on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and reappropriation 10heretofore made in Article 66, Section 15 and Article 67, 11Section 15 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 12reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 13Transportation for costs associated with process modernization 14implementation of the Department. 15    Section 20. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 17business on June 30, 2026, from the reappropriation heretofore 18made in Article 67, Section 20 of Public Act 104-0003, as 19amended, is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the 20Department of Transportation for costs associated with an 21efficiency study. 22FOR PLANNING AND PROGRAMMING 23    Section 25. The sum of $2,283,871, or so much thereof as   SB4112- 35 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 2business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 3reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 45 and 4Article 67, Section 25 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 5reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 6Transportation for Planning, Research and Development 7purposes. 8    Section 30. The sum of $117,849,300, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 11reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 45 and 12Article 67, Section 30 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 13reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 14Transportation for metropolitan planning and research purposes 15as provided by law, provided such amounts shall not exceed 16funds to be made available from the federal government or 17local sources. 18    Section 35. The sum of $65,209,589, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 20business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 21reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 45 and 22Article 67, Section 35 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 23reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 24Transportation for metropolitan planning and research purposes   SB4112- 36 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1as provided by law. 2    Section 40. The sum of $304,401, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 4on June 30, 2026, from the reappropriation heretofore made in 5Article 67, Section 40 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 6reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 7Transportation for costs incurred as directed by the 8Blue-Ribbon Commission for strategic advisory services and 9support. 10    Section 45. The sum of $2,038,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 12business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation heretofore 13made in Article 66, Section 50 of Public Act 104-0003, as 14amended, is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the 15Department of Transportation for purchase of computer 16equipment for various law enforcement agencies to provide them 17the capability of submitting crash reports electronically. 18Expenditures may not exceed the amount made available from 19NHTSA for this purpose. 20FOR HIGHWAY PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 21    Section 50. The sum of $37,949,645, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 23business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriations and   SB4112- 37 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 60, and 2Article 67, Section 45, of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 3reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 4Transportation for reimbursements of eligible expenses arising 5from Local Traffic Signal Maintenance Agreements, and 6reimbursements of eligible expenses arising from City, County, 7and other State Maintenance Agreements. 8    Section 55. The sum of $6,878,676, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 11reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 65 and 12Article 67, Section 50 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 13reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 14Transportation for repair of damages by motorists to state 15vehicles and equipment or replacement of state vehicles and 16equipment, provided such amount does not exceed funds to be 17made available from collections from claims filed by the 18Department to recover the costs of such damages. 19    Section 60. The sum of $11,909,532, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 21business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 22reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 70 and 23Article 67, Section 55 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 24reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of   SB4112- 38 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Transportation for costs associated with the State Radio 2Communications for the 21st Century (STARCOM) program. 3    Section 65. The sum of $519,812, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 5on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and reappropriation 6heretofore made in Article 66, Section 75 and Article 67, 7Section 60 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 8reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 9Transportation for costs associated with the Illinois 10Terrorism Task Force, that consist of approved purchases for 11homeland security provided such expenditures do not exceed 12funds made available by the federal government for this 13purpose. 14    Section 70. The sum of $650,881, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 16on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and reappropriation 17heretofore made in Article 66, Section 85 and Article 67, 18Section 65 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 19reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 20Transportation for costs associated with the Technology 21Transfer Center, including the purchase of equipment, media 22initiatives and training, provided that such expenditures do 23not exceed funds to be made available by the federal 24government for this purpose.   SB4112- 39 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1    Section 75. The sum of $5,777,258, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 3business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 4reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 90 and 5Article 67, Section 70 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 6reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 7Transportation for costs associated with highway safety media 8campaigns, provided such amounts do not exceed funds to be 9made available from the federal government. 10    Section 80. The sum of $39,190,755, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 12business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 13reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 95 and 14Article 67, Section 80 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 15reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 16Transportation for the IDOT ITS Program. 17    Section 85. The sum of $1,899,763, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 19business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation heretofore 20made in Article 66, Section 105 of Public Act 104-0003, as 21amended, is reappropriated from the DUI Prevention and 22Education Fund to the Department of Transportation for 23expenditures, as determined by the DUI Prevention and   SB4112- 40 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Education Commission, for crash victim programs and materials, 2impaired driving prevention programs, law enforcement support, 3and other DUI-related programs. 4    Section 90. The sum of $23,947,928, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 6business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 7reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 125 and 8Article 67, Section 85 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 9reappropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety Training Fund to 10the Department of Transportation for reimbursements to State 11and local universities and colleges for Cycle Rider Safety 12Training Programs. 13FOR AERONAUTICS 14    Section 95. The sum of $60,339,625, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 17reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 190 and 18Article 67, Section 90, of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 19reappropriated from the State Aviation Program Fund to the 20Department of Transportation for the purposes described in 21Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance Act. 22    Section 100. The sum of $50,648,805, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of   SB4112- 41 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 2reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 195 and 3Article 67, Section 95, of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 4reappropriated from the Sound-Reducing Windows and Doors 5Replacement Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 6purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance 7Act. 8FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM 9    Section 105. The sum of $30,255,584, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 12reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 275, 13and Article 67 Section 100 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 14is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 15Transportation for the Illinois Highway Safety Program and 16local highway safety projects by county and municipal 17governments, state and private universities, and other private 18entities. 19FOR INTERMODAL PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 20    Section 110. The sum of $1,151,829, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 23reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 210 and 24Article 67, Section 110 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is   SB4112- 42 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 2Transportation for public transportation technical studies. 3    Section 115. The sum of $3,341,106, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 5business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 6reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 230 and 7Article 67, Section 115 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 8reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust Fund to the 9Department of Transportation for federal reimbursement of 10costs associated with Safety and Security Oversight as set 11forth in the federal transportation bill, as amended. 12    Section 120. The sum of $7,034,946, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 15reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 235 and 16Article 67, Section 120 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 17reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust Fund to the 18Department of Transportation for federal reimbursement of 19transit studies as provided by the federal transportation 20bill, as amended. 21    Section 125. The sum of $2,475,744, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 23business on June 30, 2026, from the reappropriation heretofore   SB4112- 43 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1made in Article 67, Section 125 of Public Act 104-0003, as 2amended, is reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust 3Fund to the Department of Transportation for support to rural 4transit districts as provided by the CARES Act, including 5prior incurred costs. 6    Section 130. The sum of $11,894,753, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 8business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation and 9reappropriation heretofore made in Article 66, Section 260 and 10Article 67, Section 130 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 11reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 12Transportation for costs associated with the long-term heavy 13overhauls of locomotives. 14FOR EQUIPMENT 15    Section 135. The following named sums, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriations and 18reappropriations heretofore made in Article 66, Sections 40, 1955, 130, 135, 140, 145, 150, 155, 160, 165, 170, and 175 and 20Article 67 Section 135 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 21reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 22Transportation for equipment as follows:23Planning and Programming24  For Equipment.......................................727,682  SB4112- 44 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1Highways Project Implementation2  For Equipment....................................28,390,8793Day Labor4  For Equipment.....................................1,169,2605District 1, Schaumburg Office6  For Equipment....................................12,107,1757District 2, Dixon Office8  For Equipment.....................................3,904,9289District 3, Ottawa Office10  For Equipment.....................................4,932,20811District 4, Peoria Office12  For Equipment.....................................4,046,91613District 5, Paris Office14  For Equipment.....................................3,695,12215District 6, Springfield Office16  For Equipment.....................................4,746,44817District 7, Effingham Office18  For Equipment.....................................3,229,96719District 8, Collinsville Office20  For Equipment.....................................5,606,24921District 9, Carbondale Office 22  For Equipment.....................................3,058,98123    Total                                         $75,615,815 24    Section 140. The following named sums, or so much thereof 25as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of   SB4112- 45 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriations and 2reappropriations heretofore made in Article 66, Sections 10, 355, 130, 135, 140, 145, 150, 155, 160, 165, 170, and 175 and 4Article 67, Section 140 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 5reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 6Transportation for the purchase of Cars and Trucks as follows:7Central Administration8  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................638,6599Highways Project Implementation10  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................24,650,94611Day Labor12  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks...................3,315,46313District 1, Schaumburg Office14  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................47,116,40015District 2, Dixon Office16  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................18,634,94917District 3, Ottawa Office18  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................16,892,36919District 4, Peoria Office20  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................16,080,31521District 5, Paris Office22  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................12,989,21023District 6, Springfield Office24  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................13,104,48425District 7, Effingham Office26  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................14,526,780  SB4112- 46 -OMB104 00211 STV 10211 b1District 8, Collinsville Office2  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................18,242,7873District 9, Carbondale Office 4  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................11,493,5295    Total                                        $197,685,891 6  Total, This Article..........................$770,861,535 7    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026.